Tennessee statutes. Title 71 Welfare
Part 1 Medical Assistance Act
71-5-151. Report on use of technical assistance groups of healthcare providers in developing episode of care.

In developing or implementing any payment reform initiative involving the use of episodes of care with respect to medical assistance provided under this chapter by the bureau of TennCare or the health care finance and administration (HCFA) of the department of finance and administration, the bureau and HCFA shall report on the use of technical assistance groups of healthcare providers in developing any episode of care. The reports shall include all recommendations made by technical assistance groups throughout the period of implementation of any episode of care. In addition to any other information required in the quarterly report to the general assembly pursuant to § 71-5-104(c), the bureau of TennCare shall summarize in quarterly reports the recommendations of any technical assistance group concerning the payment reform initiative and identify any action taken by the bureau or HCFA to address those recommendations. The bureau and HCFA shall report to the health and welfare committee of the senate, the health committee of the house of representatives, and the committee of the house of representatives having oversight over TennCare by July 1 each year, beginning in 2016, specifically concerning the use of technical assistance groups, on each recommendation made by those groups, and the response by the bureau or HCFA to each recommendation. This section shall apply to any payment reform initiative utilizing episodes of care, including any initiative receiving a state innovation model initiative grant from the federal centers for medicare and medicaid services.

In developing or implementing any payment reform initiative involving the use of episodes of care with respect to medical assistance provided under this chapter by the bureau of TennCare or the HCFA of the department of finance and administration, the bureau and HCFA shall not impose a fine or penalty on any provider. The bureau and HCFA may impose withholds in order to recover some portion of costs that exceeds a cost threshold for an episode developed by the initiative. A withhold may not be called a fine or a penalty.

The bureau of TennCare and the HCFA shall study the means of fair and just implementation of the episodes of care initiatives, especially with respect to costs associated with:

A healthcare facility located in an area that lacks an alternative healthcare facility within a thirty-minute drive;

Lack of more than a single provider of healthcare services for, including, but not limited to, radiology, anesthesia, pathology, or physical therapy; and

Contractual arrangements between the bureau of TennCare, managed care organizations, and other participating providers or healthcare facilities associated with the particular episode of care if such contracts are the cause of increased costs.

No later than January 31, 2019, the bureau of TennCare and HCFA shall report the results of the study conducted pursuant to this subsection (c) to the health and welfare committee of the senate, the health committee of the house of representatives, and the committee of the house of representatives having oversight over TennCare.

In developing or implementing any payment reform initiative involving the use of episodes of care with respect to medical assistance provided under this chapter by the bureau of TennCare, a healthcare provider shall not be required to pay the portion of the risk sharing payment that is attributable to the increased cost of pain relief services if the following conditions are met:

The healthcare provider is required to make an episodes of care risk-sharing payment to a managed care organization;

Some portion of the episode costs were due to pain relief services;

The pain relief services provided to the patient were more expensive than an alternative pain relief service; and

The provider can demonstrate that the pain relief services provided to the patient had the effect of reducing opioid use by the patient relative to an alternative pain relief service routinely used by other providers in the episode.

The bureau of TennCare is authorized to promulgate rules, pursuant to the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5, as may be necessary to implement this section.

On and after July 1, 2018, in developing or implementing any payment reform initiative involving the use of episodes of care with respect to medical assistance provided under this chapter by the bureau of TennCare or the HCFA of the department of finance and administration, the bureau and the HCFA shall exclude anxiety episodes and non-emergent depression episodes from the initiative. This subsection (e) shall apply to any initiative receiving a state innovation model initiative grant from the federal centers for medicare and medicaid services.

Acts 2016, ch. 1079, § 2; 2018, ch. 766, § 1; 2018, ch. 843, § 1; 2018, ch. 1016, § 1; 2019, ch. 345, § 137.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2016, ch. 1079, § 1 provided that the act shall be known and may be cited as the “TennCare Omnibus Act of 2016”.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “the health and welfare committee of the senate, the health committee of the house of representatives, and the committee of the house of representatives having oversight over TennCare” for “the health committee of the house of representatives and the health and welfare committee of the senate” in the next to last sentence of (a); and substituted “the health and welfare committee of the senate, the health committee of the house of representatives, and the committee of the house of representatives having oversight over TennCare” for “the health and welfare committee of the senate and the health committee of the house of representatives” at the end of (c)(2).

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, ch. 345, § 148. May 10, 2019.

71-5-152. Procedure to obtain data sets derived from all payer claims database — Use of data — Annual report.

Pursuant to § 56-2-125(d)(2)(B), and no later than October 1, 2016, the deputy commissioner of finance and administration responsible for the TennCare program shall establish a procedure permitting the following to obtain data sets derived from the all payer claims database through the department authorized to access the database for the purposes authorized in § 56-2-125(b)(1) within available resources of the bureau of TennCare:

The department of finance and administration;

The department of health;

The department of mental health and substance abuse services;

The department of intellectual and developmental disabilities; and

Other departments of this state.

Any data retrieved from the database or the managing vendor may only be used for internal purposes of the department. The data shall be confidential and shall not be a public record for the purposes of title 10, chapter 7. If any department seeks to produce reports based upon the data as public documents, then the department shall submit a request for approval of that use of the data to the Tennessee health information committee.

The bureau of TennCare shall submit an annual report to the chairs of the health and welfare committee of the senate, health committee of the house of representatives, and committee of the house of representatives having oversight over TennCare that shall describe the nature and purpose of any requests to utilize data from the all payer claims database submitted to the bureau or the health information committee. Any request for data from departments that cannot be provided within existing resources of the bureau shall be identified in this report. The report shall also describe the disposition made by the Tennessee health information committee of each request to utilize the data and shall detail how each member of the committee voted on each request. The bureau shall submit the report by January 15 each year.

Acts 2016, ch. 1079, § 4; 2019, ch. 345, § 138.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2016, ch. 1079, § 1 provided that the act shall be known and may be cited as the “TennCare Omnibus Act of 2016”.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “the chairs of the health and welfare committee of the senate, health committee of the house of representatives, and committee of the house of representatives having oversight over TennCare” for “the chairs of the health committee of the house of representatives and the health and welfare committee of the senate” in the first sentence of (c).

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, ch. 345, § 148. May 10, 2019.

Cross-References. Confidentiality of public records, §10-7-504.

71-5-153. Verification of information.

Prior to awarding assistance, and on a quarterly basis thereafter, the bureau of TennCare shall verify identity information for each respective applicant and enrollee against the following:

Wage and income information maintained by state and federal sources;

Immigration status information maintained by federal citizenship and immigration services; and

Information maintained by the department of health, office of vital records.

Subsection (a) shall not take effect until the last day of the first full quarter following implementation of an automated, electronic eligibility system by the bureau of TennCare. The bureau of TennCare shall notify the executive secretary of the code commission upon implementation of an automated, electronic eligibility system.

Acts 2017, ch. 191, § 4.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2017, ch. 191, § 1 provided that the act, which enacted this section, shall be known and may be cited as the “Program lntegrity Act of 2017.”

71-5-154. Annual report relating to coverage of mental health treatment.

Every managed care organization that participates in the TennCare program shall submit an annual report to the bureau of TennCare on or before March 1 of each year that contains the following information for enrollees in the TennCare program:

The frequency with which the managed care organization required prior authorization for all prescribed procedures, services, or medications for mental health and alcoholism or drug dependence benefits during the previous calendar year and the frequency with which the managed care organization required prior authorization for all prescribed procedures, services, or medications for medical and surgical benefits during the previous calendar year. Managed care organizations must submit this information separately for inpatient benefits, outpatient benefits, emergency care benefits, and prescription drug benefits. Frequency shall be expressed as a percentage, with total prescribed procedures, services, or medications within each classification of benefits as the denominator and the overall number of times prior authorization was required for any prescribed procedures, services, or medications within each corresponding classification of benefits as the numerator;

A description of the process used to develop or select the medical necessity criteria for mental health and alcoholism or drug dependence benefits and the process used to develop or select the medical necessity criteria for medical and surgical benefits;

Identification of all non-quantitative treatment limitations (NQTLs) that are applied to both mental health and alcoholism or drug dependence benefits and medical and surgical benefits. There may be no separate NQTLs that apply to mental health and alcohol or drug dependence benefits but do not apply to medical and surgical benefits within any classification of benefits;

The results of an analysis that demonstrates that for the medical necessity criteria described in subdivision (a)(2) and for each NQTL identified in subdivision (a)(3), as written and in operation, the processes, strategies, evidentiary standards, or other factors used to apply the medical necessity criteria and each NQTL to mental health and alcoholism or drug dependence benefits are comparable to, and are applied no more stringently than the processes, strategies, evidentiary standards, or other factors used to apply the medical necessity criteria and each NQTL, as written and in operation, to medical and surgical benefits. At a minimum, the results of the analysis shall:

Identify the factors used to determine that an NQTL will apply to a benefit, including factors that were considered but rejected;

Identify and define the specific evidentiary standards used to define the factors and any other evidentiary standards relied upon in designing each NQTL;

Identify and describe methods and analyses used, including the results of the analyses, to determine that the processes and strategies used to design each NQTL as written for mental health and alcoholism or drug dependence benefits are comparable to and no more stringent than the processes and strategies used to design each NQTL as written for medical and surgical benefits;

Identify and describe the methods and analyses used, including the results of the analyses, to determine that processes and strategies used to apply each NQTL in operation for mental health and alcoholism or drug dependence benefits are comparable to and no more stringent than the processes or strategies used to apply each NQTL in operation for medical and surgical benefits; and

Disclose the specific findings and conclusions reached by the managed care organization demonstrating that the results of the analyses required by this subdivision (a)(4) indicate that the insurer or entity is in compliance with this section and the Paul Wellstone and Pete Domenici Mental Health Parity and Addiction Equity Act of 2008 (Pub. L. No. 110-343) and its implementing regulations, which include 42 CFR 438.900, 42 CFR 438.905, 42 CFR 438.910, 42 CFR 438.915, 42 CFR 438.920, and 42 CFR 438.930 and any other relevant current or future rules;

The rates of and reasons for denial of claims for inpatient, outpatient, prescription drugs, and emergency mental health and alcoholism or drug dependence services during the previous calendar year compared to the rates of, and reasons for, denial of claims in those same classifications of benefits for medical and surgical services during the previous calendar year; and

A certification signed by the managed care organization's chief executive officer and chief medical officer that affirms that the managed care organization has completed a comprehensive review of its administrative practices for the prior calendar year for compliance with this section and the Paul Wellstone and Pete Domenici Mental Health Parity and Addiction Equity Act of 2008 (Pub. L. No. 110-343).

The bureau of TennCare shall monitor managed care organization claims denials for mental health and alcoholism or drug dependence benefits on the grounds of medical necessity within each classification of benefits among inpatient benefits, outpatient benefits, prescription drugs, and emergency care. The bureau of TennCare shall study and compare denial rates among each managed care organization and shall request additional data if significant discrepancies in denial rates are found.

Acts 2017, ch. 221, § 1.

71-5-155. Medication therapy management pilot program. [Effective until June 30, 2020.]

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Bureau” means the bureau of TennCare;

“Collaborative pharmacy practice agreement” has the same meaning as defined in § 63-10-204;

“Medication therapy management pilot program” means the test program established by the bureau of TennCare meeting the definition of the term “medication therapy management program” in § 63-10-204; and

“Medication therapy management services” means the provision of direct patient care services by a pharmacist licensed under title 63, chapter 10 practicing in this state, to optimize the therapeutic outcomes of the patient's medications. Medication therapy management encompasses a broad range of professional activities and responsibilities within the licensed pharmacist's scope of practice. Medication therapy management services are independent of, but can occur in conjunction with, the provision of a medication product.

The bureau shall develop and implement a medication therapy management pilot program that seeks to provide high quality, cost-effective services in support of initiatives administered by the bureau to ensure optimal health outcomes for TennCare beneficiaries.

Any managed care organization or pharmacy benefit manager that participates in the TennCare medication therapy management pilot program, as determined by the bureau, shall administer a medication therapy management pilot program that meets the program standards and eligibility criteria as established by the bureau.

The bureau shall establish program standards and eligibility criteria for the medication therapy management pilot program. Eligibility criteria may include use of specific medications, use of classes of medications, disease states, health conditions, mental health conditions, complex medical and drug-related needs, and other clinical factors, as determined by the bureau.

Medication therapy management services shall be delivered by a participating qualified Tennessee-licensed pharmacist, as determined by the bureau, acting under a collaborative pharmacy practice agreement meeting the requirements of § 63-10-217 and within the routine scope of the practice of pharmacy, as defined in § 63-10-204, and in consultation with patients, caregivers, prescribers, and other healthcare providers, as appropriate. Technical responsibilities related to medication therapy management services, other than the delivery of direct patient care services, such as obtaining accurate medication histories and records, scheduling visits, documentation, and billing for services, may be delegated to pharmacy technicians and other pharmacy personnel at the discretion of the pharmacist responsible for delivering the service.

Nothing in this section shall expand or modify the scope of the practice of pharmacy as defined in title 63, chapter 10, part 2.

The bureau shall establish reimbursement rates for medication therapy management services provided by pharmacists under a collaborative pharmacy practice agreement within the medication therapy management pilot program.

For purposes of reimbursement for medication therapy management services, the bureau, or its managed care organizations, may enroll individual pharmacists as providers under their medicaid provider program. The bureau may also establish contract requirements necessary to implement the pilot program.

Any cost savings realized by the bureau through administration of the medication therapy management pilot program shall be prioritized for use in expanding the administration of the medication therapy management pilot program. Any expansion of the pilot program shall be determined by the bureau upon conclusion of the pilot program and after evaluation of the pilot program to determine overall impact to the program in terms of cost-effectiveness and medical outcomes.

As part of the pilot program, the bureau may seek input from pharmacists, primary care providers, or other key stakeholders to provide technical assistance in the development and implementation of the bureau's medication therapy management pilot program.

The medication therapy management pilot program shall terminate on June 30, 2020.

Acts 2017, ch. 363, § 1.

Cross-References. Reporting of costs and patient outcomes, §63-10-222.

71-5-156. Development of policy regarding births involving neonatal abstinence syndrome and opiod use by women of childbearing age.

As used in this section:

“Bureau” means the bureau of TennCare; and

“Managed care organization” or “MCO” means a health maintenance organization, behavioral health organization, or managed health insurance issuer that participates in the TennCare program.

The general assembly finds that issues raised by births of children with neonatal abstinence syndrome and the use of opioids by women of childbearing age constitute a critical problem for enrollees in the TennCare program, healthcare providers, the TennCare program, public health, and the fiscal well-being of the state.

In order to address issues raised by births of children with neonatal abstinence syndrome and the use of opioids by women of childbearing age in the TennCare program, the bureau is directed to promptly fully review these issues and to develop an appropriate and accountable policy response that includes both primary prevention and secondary prevention.

On or before September 1, 2017, the bureau shall issue appropriate requests for information for program initiatives aimed at primary prevention and secondary prevention of births involving neonatal abstinence syndrome and the use of opioids by women of childbearing age enrolled in the TennCare program.

Each MCO that participates in the TennCare program shall provide the overall medical loss ratio for the MCO with respect to the TennCare program. The MCO shall also calculate a medical loss ratio with respect to expenditures associated with neonatal abstinence syndrome and the use of opioids by women of childbearing age enrolled in the TennCare program.

For purposes of this subsection (e), “medical loss ratio” means the ratio of medical claims and quality improvement activities to the total funds received by the MCO from the bureau pursuant to its contractor risk agreement.

Nothing in this section shall affect contracts in effect on June 6, 2017, with the managed care organizations for program services related to opioid use by women of childbearing age enrolled in the TennCare program.

The bureau shall report concerning the progress and implementation of the program authorized by this section to the speaker of the house of representatives, the speaker of the senate, the comptroller of the treasury, the chair of the health committee of the house of representatives, and the chair of the health and welfare committee of the senate beginning on September 1, 2017, and thereafter on a quarterly basis.

The bureau shall recommend to the general assembly any legislation necessary to implement initiatives selected under subsection (g) on or before January 15, 2018.

If the commissioner of finance and administration, in consultation with the bureau, determines that a federal waiver or an amendment to an existing federal waiver is necessary in order to implement initiatives under this section, the commissioner shall promptly apply for an appropriate waiver or waiver amendment to the United States department of health and human services.

Acts 2017, ch. 483, § 3.

71-5-157. Establishment of state policy to avoid use of state funds for elective abortions.

It is the policy of the state to favor childbirth as integral to the health and welfare of the citizens of the state and therefore to favor family planning services that do not include elective abortions or the promotion of elective abortions within the continuum of care or services offered by the provider and to avoid the direct or indirect use of state funds to promote or support elective abortions.

In furtherance of this state policy, a waiver amendment to the existing TennCare II waiver that requires elective abortion providers be excluded from participation as providers in the TennCare program shall be submitted to the federal centers for medicare and medicaid services for approval. The waiver amendment shall be implemented within ten (10) business days of approval.

For purposes of this section, an “elective abortion provider” means any entity that performed, or operated or maintained a facility that performed, more than fifty (50) abortions in the previous year, or any affiliate of such an entity.

This section does not affect compliance with § 9-4-5116.

Acts 2018, ch. 682, § 1.

71-5-158. Amendment to TennCare ll waiver relating to work and community engagement requirements for certain adult enrollees.

An amendment to the existing TennCare II waiver shall be submitted to the federal centers for medicare and medicaid services (CMS) authorizing the bureau of TennCare to create reasonable work and community engagement requirements for able-bodied working age adult enrollees without dependent children under the age of six (6). The waiver shall be consistent with the most recent guidance to state medicaid directors provided by CMS concerning opportunities to promote work and community engagement in demonstration projects authorized under § 1115 of the federal social security act (42 U.S.C. § 1315). The state shall seek the necessary approval from the United States department of health and human services to utilize funds from the temporary assistance to needy families (TANF) program under the Families First Act of 1996, compiled in chapter 3, part 1 of this title, for eligible expenditures related to the waiver. Implementation of the waiver shall be contingent upon the available use of TANF funds or other federal appropriations to meet the requirements of the waiver.

Acts 2018, ch. 869, § 1.

71-5-159. Complex rehabilitation technology.

As used in this section, “complex rehabilitation technology”:

Means items classified within medicare as group 3, group 4, or group 5 power wheelchairs and manual wheelchairs with the HCPCS billing codes K0005 and E1161; and

Includes options and accessories related to any of such items.

The commissioner of finance and administration, or the commissioner's designee, shall recognize complex rehabilitation technology as a separate covered service from other items considered to be durable medical equipment within medicare, and must list complex rehabilitation technology benefits separately on any proposed budget document or other financial publication made available to the public if the budget document or other financial publication establishes a change in reimbursement for complex rehabilitation technology.

Acts 2019, ch. 96, § 1.

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, ch. 96, § 2. March 28, 2019.

71-5-160. Maintenance of coverage trust fund.

There is continued and revived, if necessary, a segregated account within the state treasury that shall be known as the maintenance of coverage trust fund created by Chapter 909 of the Public Acts of 2010. The fund shall not be used to replace any moneys otherwise appropriated to the TennCare program by the general assembly or to replace any moneys appropriated outside of the TennCare program.

The maintenance of coverage trust fund shall consist of:

All annual coverage assessments received by the bureau; and

Investment earnings credited to the assets of the maintenance of coverage trust fund.

Monies credited or deposited to the maintenance of coverage trust fund together with all federal matching funds shall be available to and used by the bureau only for expenditures in the TennCare program and shall include the purposes authorized in the annual coverage assessment act enacted by the general assembly and codified in this title.

Acts 2010, ch. 909, § 1; 2012, ch. 645, § 2; T.C.A. §71-5-1005; Acts 2014, ch. 877, § 2.

Code Commission Notes.

Acts 2013, ch. 250, § 2 purported to add subsection (e) to this section, effective July 1, 2013; however, those provisions were added as §71-5-706 [repealed] by authority of the code commission.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2012, ch. 645, § 2 provided that the Tennessee code commission is directed to continue former §71-5-1005 and transfer former §71-5-1005 to §71-5-160, in accord with the clear legislative intent of Acts 2010, ch. 909 and Acts 2011, ch. 189.

Former title 71, ch. 5, part 10 concerned the Annual Coverage Assessment Act of 2010, which was enacted by Acts 2010, ch. 909, § 1, and was amended by Acts 2011, ch. 410, § 6(e), (f). Section 71-5-1006 of the Annual Coverage Assessment Act of 2010 provided: “This act shall expire on June 30, 2011; provided, however, the following rights and obligations shall survive expiration of this act:

“(1) The authority of the bureau to impose late payment penalties and to collect unpaid annual coverage assessments and required refunds;

“(2) The rights of a covered hospital or an association of covered hospitals to file a petition for declaratory order to determine whether the annual coverage assessment has been validly imposed; and

“(3) The obligation of the bureau to use and apply the assets of the maintenance coverage trust fund.”

71-5-161. Hospital payment rate corridors.

This section continues the hospital payment rate corridors applicable to payments by managed care organizations to hospitals for services provided to TennCare enrollees established by § 71-5-703(b)(3), as enacted by Chapter 276 of the Public Acts of 2015.

Hospital payment rate variation corridors shall be established by the state's actuary and approved by the bureau of TennCare for payments by managed care organizations to hospitals for services provided to TennCare enrollees as follows:

As required by § 71-5-703(b)(3), as enacted by Chapter 276 of the Public Acts of 2015, the bureau shall implement provisions in its contractor risk agreements (CRAs) with all managed care organizations requiring payment rates for each hospital in the aggregate from all managed care organizations with which the hospital has network contracts to be no less than the minimum levels or more than the maximum levels set forth in subsections (c) and (d); and

Compliance with these standards shall be determined on the basis of the totality of all rates for the hospital by all managed care organizations in the aggregate with which it has a network contract, rather than on the basis of rates for a hospital under a network contract with an individual managed care organization. Managed care organizations shall not enter into or maintain a single case agreement or contract with any hospital that authorizes or requires rates for the hospital that do not conform to the hospital payment variability standards set forth in this section.

The minimum and maximum levels for aggregate rates to hospitals for services to TennCare enrollees shall be based on the percentages of each hospital's federal fiscal year (FFY) 2011 medicare reimbursement set forth in subsection (d). Compliance with these minimum and maximum payment rates shall be determined on the basis of the totality of payments to a hospital for services to TennCare enrollees from all managed care organizations with which the hospital has a network contract. The variation corridors established by this subsection (c) are for the purpose of limiting the amount of variation in the rates paid by TennCare managed care organizations to hospitals, and this subsection (c) shall not create a right by a hospital to receive any actual amount of reimbursement in the aggregate from all TennCare managed care organizations.

For routine, nonspecialized inpatient services, the minimum level is fifty-three and eight-tenths percent (53.8%), and the maximum level is eighty percent (80%);

For outpatient services, the minimum level is ninety-three and two-tenths percent (93.2%), and the maximum level is one hundred and four percent (104%);

For cardiac surgery services, the minimum level is thirty-two percent (32%), and the maximum level is eighty-three percent (83%);

For specialized neonatal services, the minimum level is four percent (4%), and the maximum level is one hundred seventy-four percent (174%); and

For other specialized services, the minimum level is forty-nine percent (49%), and the maximum level is one hundred sixty-four percent (164%).

The bureau shall publish the list of MS-DRGs included in each service category on its website, and the bureau shall update the list annually to reflect any changes as necessary.

The bureau shall maintain rules implementing the requirements of this section. All rules promulgated by the commissioner of finance and administration or the bureau prior to and in effect on July 1, 2016, concerning the annual coverage assessment under this part or Chapter 276 of the Public Acts of 2015, shall remain in force and effect and shall be administered and enforced by the bureau until these rules are modified.

Acts 2016, ch. 854, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Section 71-7-703, referred to in this section, expired effective June 30, 2016.

71-5-162. Identification of child enrollees eligible for federal supplemental security income upon reaching 18 years of age
— Counseling — Enrollment assistance.

The bureau of TennCare shall establish a program that:

Identifies child enrollees in TennCare who, by reason of a disability, are likely to be eligible for federal supplemental security income upon reaching eighteen (18) years of age;

In the year prior to each eligible child enrollee's eighteenth birthday, counsels the child and the child's parent or guardian on the benefits available from and enrollment requirements for the federal supplemental security income program; and

Provides enrollment assistance to the child prior to the child's eighteenth birthday in a manner that the bureau determines is most likely to ensure that there will be no gap in TennCare eligibility or coverage due to the child reaching eighteen (18) years of age.

Acts 2019, ch. 310, § 1.

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, ch. 310, § 2. May 8, 2019.

71-5-163. Submission of waiver in order to provide medical assistance to TennCare ll waiver population by means of block grant.

The governor, acting through the commissioner of finance and administration, is directed to submit to the federal centers for medicare and medicaid services a waiver amendment to the existing TennCare II waiver, or to submit a new waiver, in order to provide medical assistance to the TennCare II waiver population by means of a block grant in accordance with this section no later than one hundred eighty (180) days after May 24, 2019. The block grant authorized by this section may convert the federal share of all medical assistance funding for this state into an allotment that is tailored to meet the needs of this state and that:

When determining the base amount for the block grant, factors the current inaccurate reflection of the state's labor costs in the state's Medicare Wage Index and the index's negative impact on healthcare delivery in this state;

Is indexed for population growth;

Is indexed for inflation and other costs;

Excludes from the block grant financing amount any expenses that are not included in the state's existing 1115 demonstration waiver;

Excludes administrative costs from the block grant financing amount and permits the state to continue to draw federal matching funds for administrative costs;

Provides the state with maximum flexibility with regard to existing federal mandates and regulations and with implementing cost controls as determined appropriate by the state, and either exempts the state from the requirements of any new mandates, regulations, or federal court orders during the period of block grant financing or increases the amount of block grant financing to offset any cost increases to the state from such mandates, regulations, or federal court orders;

Provides the state with maximum flexibility regarding pharmacy benefits including fluctuation of prescription drug costs, diabetic testing supplies, and over-the-counter medications;

Provides the state with maximum flexibility to serve other needy populations with distinct financial or healthcare needs; and

Remains at the level set according to the block grant without any decrease in the federal share of all medical assistance funding for this state based on deflation or a reduction in population.

A waiver amendment to the existing TennCare II waiver requested pursuant to subsection (a), if approved by the federal government and the commissioner of finance and administration, does not take effect unless subsequently authorized by joint resolution of the general assembly.

Acts 2019, ch. 481, § 1.

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, ch. 481, § 2. May 24, 2019.